Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2052.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5280YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2052 Section 1. Section 256C.3, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. (1) A school district may enter into 3 a chapter 28E agreement with a community-based provider to 4 allow the community-based provider to provide high-quality 5 instruction as part of the approved local program. 6 (2) Upon the request of a community-based provider, a 7 school district shall enter into a chapter 28E agreement with a 8 community-based provider to allow the community-based provider 9 to provide high-quality instruction as part of the approved 10 local program. 11 (3) A chapter 28E agreement entered into pursuant to this 12 paragraph shall not limit the number of eligible students who 13 may receive high-quality instruction from a community-based 14 provider as part of the approved local program. 15